Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB483.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 45A.600 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) When an agency of Kentucky state government or a public university safety
and security department organized pursuant to KRS 164.950 transitions from
the use of one (1) firearm owned by that agency to another, the agency may
sell the firearm that is being replaced directly to an employee of the agency if:
1. The firearm was issued to the employee in the course of employment;
and
2. The employee is otherwise authorized by law to own or possess the
firearm.
(b) 1. The agency shall notify employees of the intended replacement of
firearms and that employees may purchase firearms pursuant to
paragraph (a) of this subsection.
2. The employee desiring to purchase the firearm issued to the employee
shall notify the head of the issuing agency of his or her intention not less
than ten (10) days after receiving notice of the intended replacement.
(2) (a) Upon retirement from state employment, a state employee to whom a firearm
has been issued during the course of employment may purchase the firearm
which was issued during the course of employment if the employee is
otherwise authorized to privately own or possess the firearm.
(b) The employee desiring to purchase the firearm issued to the employee shall
notify the head of the issuing agency of such intention not less than thirty (30)
days prior to the scheduled date of retirement.
(3) (a) The purchase price of a firearm purchased under subsection (1) of this
section shall be the fair market value determined by the Finance and
Administration Cabinet, Division of Personal Property.
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 1/22/2026 2:38 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1673
(b) The purchase price of a firearm purchased under subsection (2) of this
section shall be the fair market value on the date of issuance to the
employee as determined by the Finance and Administration Cabinet,
Division of Personal Property, reduced by ten percent (10%) for each year
the firearm was issued to the employee until the calculated value of the
firearm reaches fifty dollars ($50).
(c) The proceeds from the sale of the firearm purchased under subsection (1) or
(2) of this section shall be deposited to the credit of an agency account for the
issuing agency and shall be used for the purpose of purchasing replacement
firearms.
(4) Any firearms that are not purchased by employees or retirees shall be disposed of
pursuant to KRS 45A.047.
(5) This statute shall supersede other state laws with regard to the disposition of state
property for the purpose stated in this section and for no other purpose.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 1/22/2026 2:38 PM Jacketed